Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB540.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2710. Crew requirement.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a freight train in this Commonwealth shall be operated with a crew of at least two individuals, one of whom must be a conductor and one of whom must be a locomotive engineer.(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) does not apply to any of the following:(1) A freight train operated within a repair, mechanical or servicing facility and yard connected to the facility.(2) Any other freight train described by the commission in accordance with subsection (c).123456789101112131415161718 (c) Consistency with Federal law and regulations.--The commission may promulgate rules and regulations providing an additional exception to subsection (a), if the exception is required by Federal law or regulation and the commission's rule or regulation is consistent with the Federal law or regulation.(d) Penalties.--A railroad that violates subsection (a) shall be assessed a civil penalty in the following amounts:(1) A fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000 for a first offense.(2) A fine of not less than $10,000 nor more than $15,000 for a second offense committed within three years of the first offense.(3) A fine of not less than $15,000 nor more than $20,000 for a third offense and subsequent offenses committed within three years of the first offense.(e) Deposit of penalties.--Notwithstanding section 3315 (relating to disposition of fines and penalties), a penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund, deemed an augmentation to any appropriation to the commission and used to administer and enforce this chapter.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Freight locomotive." A railroad locomotive used exclusively for the conveyance of property."Freight train." One or more freight locomotives coupled to rail cars.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0540PN0536 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728